Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.055

Amending articles—Filing with director—Contents.

A bank amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver articles of amendment to the director for filing as required for articles of incorporation. The articles of amendment shall set forth:

(1) The name of the bank;

(2) The text of each amendment adopted;

(3) The date of each amendment's adoption;

(4) If the amendment was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that shareholder action was not required; and

(5) If shareholder action was required, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the shareholders in accordance with the provisions of RCW 30A.08.090.

[ 2014 c 37 s 154; 1994 c 256 s 53. Formerly RCW 30.08.055.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.